California statutes. Water Code
This special provision is necessary because the Mariana Ranchos County Water District is located in a desert area where water primarily benefits only land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1908.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.2.

Annually, the Sierra Lakes County Water District, Placer County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy a bond tax on land only in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both land and improvements, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

This special provision is necessary because of the benefit to undeveloped land within the Sierra Lakes County Water District by the availability of improvements in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2045.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.3.

Annually, the Circle Oaks County Water District, Napa County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy a bond tax on land only in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both land and improvements, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

This special provision is necessary because of the benefit to undeveloped land within the Circle Oaks County Water District by the availability of improvements in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2045.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.4.

Upon request of the Apple Valley Heights County Water District, the board of supervisors shall levy the bond tax and taxes for loans and other indebtedness in proportion to the assessed valuation of the land in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt and other indebtedness. The tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both real and personal, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

The provisions of this section apply only with respect to bonds and other indebtedness issued by the Apple Valley Heights County Water District, in San Bernardino County,

This special provision is necessary because the Apple Valley Heights County Water District is located in a desert area where water primarily benefits only land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 822.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.5.

Annually, the Desert View County Water District, San Bernardino County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy a bond tax on land only in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both land and improvements, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

This special provision is necessary because the Desert View County Water District is uniquely located in a desert area where water provided by the district primarily benefits only land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 734.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.6.

Annually, the Pinedale County Water District, Fresno County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy, a bond tax on land only in Pinedale County Water District, Improvement District No. 2, benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both land and improvements, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

This special provision is necessary because of the special benefit to undeveloped land within the Pinedale County Water District, Improvement District No. 2, from the availability of district improvements in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 822.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.7.

Upon request of the Cucamonga County Water District, the board of supervisors shall levy an improvement district tax on land within any improvement district within Cucamonga County Water District for the purpose of financing improvements in such improvement district. The tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both real and personal, located on the land within such an improvement district.

The provisions of this section apply only with respect to taxes levied within an improvement district in the Cucamonga County Water District. This special provision is necessary because of the unique benefits to undeveloped land within the Cucamonga County Water District by the availability of improvements in such improvement districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.8.

Annually, the El Dorado Hills County Water District, El Dorado County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy, a bond tax on land only in the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt. The bond tax levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all property, both land and improvements, located on the land benfited by the purposes of the bonded debt.

This special provision is necessary because of the benefit to undeveloped land within the El Dorado Hills County Water District by the availability of improvements in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

31703.9.

Annually, the Juniper Riviera County Water District, San Bernardino County, may request, and the board of supervisors shall levy, any one, or all, bond or other taxes on land only within the district or improvement district benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt and other indebtedness. Such tax, or taxes, levied pursuant to this section constitutes a lien on all taxable property, both real and personal, located on the land benefited by the purposes of the bonded debt or other indebtedness.

This special provision is necessary because the Juniper Riviera County Water District is uniquely located in a desert area where water provided by the district primarily benefits only land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

31704.

Taxes levied by the Coachella Valley County Water District for payment of the principal of, or interest on bonded indebtedness, where the proceeds of such bonds were used for the construction and installation of sewer facilities to provide sewer service to an area, including either wholly or in part a community redevelopment project area, shall not be apportioned as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, but shall be allocated solely to the Coachella Valley County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

31706.

All district taxes shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and form as county taxes and shall be paid to the district for which they were levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31707.

Subject to the provisions of Section 31707.1, taxes for the payment of a bonded debt and the interest on it are a lien on all the property benefited thereby as stated in the resolution of the board of directors declaring the necessity to incur the debt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1295.)
-------------------------------------------

31707.1.

No bonded debt and no lien therefor is created or exists as to authorized bonds prior to issuance. Upon issuance a debt is created only as to the bonds issued and a lien is created therefor but only upon the property which on the date of bond issuance is then within the district or improvement districts therein benefited by the bonded debt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1295.)
-------------------------------------------

31707.5.

(a) Taxes for the payment of all charges, claims, expenditures and expenses, other than a bonded debt, of any improvement district created pursuant to this division are a lien on all the property described in the resolution of the board creating such improvement district.

(b) All taxes for purposes other than those specified in Section 31707 or subdivision (a) of this section are a lien on all the property in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1182.)
-------------------------------------------

31708.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, in the case of a sale of property for taxes or assessments, except where the sale is conducted and the funds are accounted for as provided in Division 1 (commencing with Section 101) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all proceeds shall be accounted for and distributed as provided in Article 12 (commencing with Section 53925) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

This section shall apply with respect to any district assessing, levying, or collecting its own taxes under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31730) as provided for in Section 8 of Chapter 592 of the Statutes of 1967.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 648.)
-------------------------------------------

31709.

District taxes whether for the payment of a bonded indebtedness and the interest on it or for other purposes are of the same force and effect as other liens for taxes, and their collection shall be enforced by the same means as provided for the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  [CHAPTER 3. Alternative Tax Procedure ] [31805. - 31822.]



  [ARTICLE 5. Collections Generally] [31805. - 31805.]

31805.

All district taxes levied on real property and improvements are a lien upon the same, which lien attaches as of noon on the first day of March of the year in which the tax is levied, and all taxes levied upon personal property are a lien upon the real property of the owner of the personal property, which lien attaches as of noon on the first day in March of the year in which the tax is levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 89.   Applicable, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 89, to districts operating under former Chapter 3 pursuant to Stats. 1967, Ch. 592, Sec. 8.   Note: Chapter 3, commencing with Section 31730, was repealed Nov. 8, 1967, by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------



  [ARTICLE 6. Collection by the Assessor] [31822. - 31822.]

31822.

If the assessee owns taxable real property in fee in the district, the taxes due upon the possession of, claim to, or right to the possession of land are respectively a lien upon that real property, which lien attaches as of the first day of March in each year. The taxes need not be collected by the assessor if in his opinion the taxable real property is sufficient to secure the payment of the taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 89.   Applicable, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 89, to districts operating under former Chapter 3 pursuant to Stats. 1967, Ch. 592, Sec. 8.   Note: Chapter 3, commencing with Section 31730, was repealed Nov. 8, 1967, by Stats. 1967, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [32200. - 32554.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exclusion [32200. - 32200.]

32200.

Any tract of land included within any district and not substantially and directly benefited by being in the district, or by its continued inclusion therein, may be excluded from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion [32400. - 32400.]

32400.

Land not a part of the district whether or not contiguous to it or to other portions added to the district, and consisting of any portion of the county wherein the district was formed or of any municipality therein, or of land in any county contiguous to the county wherein the district was formed or of any municipality therein, may be included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Inclusion in Improvement Districts [32550. - 32554.]

32550.

Territory within a district may be annexed to an improvement district whether or not contiguous thereto, provided that such territory is not a part of an improvement district constituted for a similar purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 425.)
-------------------------------------------

32551.

The procedure for such annexation shall be the same as the procedure for annexing land to a district set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 57075) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code, without the preliminary proceedings provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56825) of Part 3 of Division 3 of Title 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 400, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32552.

If all the owners of land within the territory proposed to be annexed have given their written assent to such annexation, the board may by resolution order such an annexation (a) without notice and hearing by the board, (b) without an election, or (c) without notice and hearing by the board and without an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

32553.

After the adoption of a resolution ordering such annexation, or a resolution confirming an order of annexation following an election thereon, the secretary shall file a certified copy thereof with a map of the territory thus annexed with the county assessor and the county tax collector of each county in which such annexed territory is situated and with the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

32554.

Territory annexed to an improvement district shall be subject to existing bond issues and indebtedness of the improvement district from and after the filing with the county assessor specified in Section 32553.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.2. Coachella Valley Water District [32600. - 32603.]

32600.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this part.

(a) “Board” means the Board of Directors of the Coachella Valley Water District.

(b) “District” means the Coachella Valley Water District.

(c) “New industrial facilities” means industrial facilities for which either of the following applies:

(1) The building permit for that facility is issued on or after January 1, 2010.

(2) If a building permit is not required for that facility, construction for that facility commences on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 671, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32601.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of potable domestic water for nonpotable uses for cemeteries, parks, highway landscaped areas, new industrial facilities, landscaped common areas of residential developments maintained by a homeowner’s association, and golf course irrigation is a waste and an unreasonable use of the water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution, if nonpotable water,
 including recycled water, is available under all of the following conditions as determined by the board, after notice to any person or local public agency that may be ordered to use nonpotable water or to cease using potable water and a hearing held by the board if requested by the person or local public agency:

(1) The board determines that the source of nonpotable water is of adequate quality for the proposed use and is available for that use. In determining adequate quality, the board shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, food and employee safety, and level and types of specific constituents in the nonpotable water affecting the use, on a user-by-user basis. In addition, the board shall consider the effect of the use of nonpotable water in lieu of potable water on the generation of hazardous waste and on the
 quality of wastewater discharges subject to permit.

(2) The board determines that the nonpotable water may be furnished for the proposed use at a reasonable cost to the user. In determining reasonable cost, the board shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the present and projected costs of supplying, delivering, and treating potable domestic water for the proposed use and the present and projected costs of supplying and delivering nonpotable water for that use, and finds that the cost of supplying the nonpotable water is comparable to, or less than, the cost of supplying potable domestic water.

(3) The State Department of Public Health determines that the use of nonpotable water from the proposed source will not be detrimental to public health.

(4) The California regional water quality control board determines that the use of nonpotable water from the proposed source will comply with any applicable water quality control plan.

(5) The board determines that the use of nonpotable water for the proposed use will not adversely affect groundwater rights, will not degrade water quality, and is determined not to be injurious to plant life, fish, and wildlife.

(b) In making the determination described in subdivision (a), the board shall consider the impact of the cost and quality of the nonpotable water on each individual user.

(c) The board may require a person or public agency to furnish information that the
 board determines to be relevant to making the determinations described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   (AB 1896)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32602.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the other requirements of this part, no person or local public agency shall use water within the district’s service area from any source that is suitable for potable domestic use for nonpotable uses for cemeteries, parks, highway landscaped areas, new industrial facilities, landscaped common areas of residential developments maintained by a homeowner’s association, and golf course irrigation, if the board, in accordance with Section 32601, determines that suitable nonpotable
 water is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 267, Sec. 3.   (AB 1896)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

32603.

(a) The use of nonpotable water, including recycled water, in accordance with this part is subject to all applicable state regulation.

(b) This part only applies to a use of water within the district’s service area that is not the subject of a determination pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7.

(c) This part is in addition to, and not a limitation upon, any powers of a public agency or a court to prevent the waste or unreasonable use of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 671, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. COACHELLA MERGER [33100. - 33162.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [33100. - 33106.]

33100.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Coachella District Merger Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33101.

The State and the people thereof have a primary and supreme interest in securing to the inhabitants and property owners within the Coachella Valley and adjacent land in Riverside County the greatest possible use and conservation of, and protection from, the waters naturally flowing into the valley from the surrounding mountainous watershed and the greatest possible use of other waters available to the area, thereby assuring that the greatest productivity of the largest possible area may be accomplished and safely carried on within reasonable limits of economy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33102.

Investigation having shown that conditions in the Coachella Valley are peculiar to that valley, it is hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable thereto and that this part is therefore necessary for the proper distribution, use, and control of the water available for the valley and the protection of the valley from storm water by the means provided in this part and for elimination of duplication of governmental authority and securing greater economy of administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33103.

The Coachella Valley County Water District was prior to October 19, 1937, formed primarily for irrigation purposes, and the Coachella Valley Storm Water District was prior to October 19, 1937, formed for reclamation and protection purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33104.

This chapter is enacted in part under the authority expressly granted in Section 13 of Article XI of the Constitution of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.

This part shall be given a liberal construction for the purpose of sustaining any and all proceedings taken hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33106.

Nothing in this part shall impair or adversely affect any right of any bondholder or creditor of the storm water district or the county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Merger [33115. - 33121.]

33115.

The Coachella Valley Storm Water District of Riverside County was merged into the Coachella Valley County Water District on October 19, 1937, pursuant to Chapter 469 of the Statutes of 1937.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33116.

The surviving district comprises all land in the county water district at the time of the merger plus inclusions, and less exclusions, of land thereafter made pursuant to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33117.

The name of the surviving district is Coachella Valley County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33118.

The surviving district is a public agency of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33119.

Upon the merger of the two districts the storm water district for all purposes ceased to exist, and the offices of its trustees and officers thereupon terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33120.

Upon the merger the directors and officers of the county water district then in office constituted the directors and officers of the surviving district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33121.

Upon the merger the surviving district succeeded to all properties, rights and contracts of each of the two districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Operation of Surviving District [33135. - 33146.]

33135.

Except as in this part expressly provided the surviving district shall be in all respects operated, managed, and governed, its directors and officers shall be elected or appointed, and its revenues shall be raised and expended as provided by law for county water districts generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33136.

In addition to the powers in this part conferred, the surviving district has all of the powers and duties of a storm water district as now or hereafter provided in the Storm Water District Act of 1909.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33137.

In addition to the powers in this part conferred the board of directors and officers of the surviving district shall perform all functions of boards of directors and officers of county water districts and of boards of trustees and corresponding officers of storm water districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33138.

In the case of conflict between the Storm Water District Act of 1909 and this division, this division prevails.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33139.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part, the surviving district may provide for and carry on the construction, operation, and maintenance of works, improvements, and functions authorized by the Storm Water District Act of 1909 either as authorized in that act or as authorized by this division. The district may raise funds for these purposes in any manner authorized or permitted by either the Storm Water District Act of 1909 or this division, and is specifically authorized to raise funds by special assessment on benefited land in proportion to the benefits derived by the benefited lands pursuant to Section 53753 of the Government Code, or by adopting fees and charges pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII D of the California
 Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   (SB 171)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

33140.

All actions and proceedings pending by or against the storm water district at the time of the merger may be prosecuted to final judgment for or against the storm water district, or the surviving district may be substituted as a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33141.

After the merger no action or proceeding shall be brought for or against the storm water district or its trustees or officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33142.

All actions and proceedings commenced after the merger either on account of affairs of the storm water district or affairs of the county water district shall be prosecuted by or against the surviving district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33143.

All outstanding bonded and other indebtedness of the storm water district and of the county water district at the time of the merger has been assumed by the surviving district and all bondholders and creditors of the two districts may enforce their rights against the surviving district in like manner as might have been done against the storm water district or the county water district if the two districts had not been merged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33144.

The board of directors and officers of the surviving district shall perform all duties and functions of the board of trustees and corresponding officers of the storm water district relating to the assessment, levy, and collection of taxes for the payment of all outstanding bonds and other indebtedness of the storm water district in the same manner and at the same times as is provided in the Storm Water District Act of 1909, and all county officers and boards of supervisors shall likewise perform their functions and duties with relation to assessment, levy, and collection of taxes for the payment of the bonds and other indebtedness of the storm water district as is provided in the Storm Water District Act of 1909.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33145.

All money required for repair, operation, and maintenance of improvements constructed by the storm water district and the cost of which was borne by the owners of particular land in the storm water district may be charged and collected by tax against that land, or notwithstanding anything in the Storm Water District Act of 1909 to the contrary, the board of directors of the surviving district may by ordinance determine that the money shall be raised by tax on the entire storm water unit, in which case the money shall thereafter be so raised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33146.

Land may be added to the surviving district or excluded therefrom in any manner and with the same effect as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Storm Water Unit [33160. - 33162.]

33160.

The surviving district contains an improvement district, designated “Storm Water Unit,” which consists of land in the storm water district at the time of the merger plus inclusions, and less exclusions, of land thereafter made pursuant to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33161.

The storm water unit shall solely be and remain taxable or assessable for bonds, indebtedness, works, improvements, and functions authorized by the Storm Water District Act of 1909.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

33162.

Land may be added to or excluded from the storm water unit in a manner as nearly as may be as land is added to or excluded from county water districts as provided in this division and not in the manner provided in the Storm Water District Act of 1909.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9.1. COSTA MESA MERGER [33200. - 33249.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [33200. - 33207.]

33200.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Costa Mesa District Merger Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33201.

The State and the people thereof have a primary and supreme interest in securing to the inhabitants, property owners and water users within the City of Costa Mesa, the Newport Heights Irrigation District, the Fairview County Water District, and the Newport Mesa County Water District, the greatest possible efficient use and conservation of waters, both local and imported, that may be accomplished economically. Investigation has shown that the water supply problem of the Costa Mesa area and of Orange County is peculiar to that area and it is hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable thereto. It is hereby declared necessary for the proper reorganization of water supply, storage, conservation and use that this part be adopted to provide the means of eliminating expensive and wasteful duplication of water systems and securing a greater economy and efficiency of administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33202.

The City of Costa Mesa was incorporated on June 29, 1953, primarily for the purpose of providing municipal functions and services, including the providing of a water supply to its area; the Newport Heights Irrigation District was formed on August 5, 1918, primarily for providing a water supply to its land and inhabitants; the Fairview County Water District was formed on October 5, 1946, primarily for supplying water to its lands and inhabitants; and the Newport Mesa County Water District was formed on July 26, 1954, primarily for the purpose of supplying water to its land and inhabitants and to replace the Newport Mesa Irrigation District; that there is an overlapping, in whole or in part, of some of these districts and total contiguity, in that all of the districts and the city form a single contiguous unit. The new Costa Mesa County Water District, if formed, will include substantially all of the City of Costa Mesa within its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33203.

This part is enacted partially under the authority expressly granted in Section 13 of Article XI of the Constitution of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33204.

This part shall be given a liberal construction for the purpose of sustaining any and all proceedings taken hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33205.

Nothing in this part shall impair or adversely affect any right of any bondholder or creditor of any of the districts involved in this merger or of the City of Costa Mesa.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33206.

For the purpose of accomplishing the dissolution, merger, and creation of the new district, the City of Costa Mesa may participate to the extent of transferring its water system and appurtenances and contributing its share of funds for the operation of the new district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

33207.

The name of the Costa Mesa County Water District as created pursuant to this part is hereby changed to the Mesa Consolidated Water District. Any reference in this part to the Costa Mesa County Water District shall hereafter be deemed to refer to the Mesa Consolidated Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 634.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Merger [33215. - 33224.]

33215.

The Costa Mesa County Water District is hereby created, which includes the area of the Newport Heights Irrigation District, the Fairview County Water District, the Newport Mesa County Water District, the Newport Mesa Irrigation District, and the portion of the City of Costa Mesa not included in the above districts. The new Costa Mesa County Water District resulting from this merger comprises all of the area in the above named districts and the City of Costa Mesa and the boundaries of the Costa Mesa County Water District are described as follows:

All that certain real property situated in the State of California, County of Orange, described as follows:
